Louisiana, session 2026, HB962.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 37:930.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §930.1. Administering reconstituted medication
8 A registered nurse may execute preparation of medication, mixing,
9 reconstitution, or similar acts for immediate administration when carrying out the
10 orders of an authorized prescriber.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.